Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXIII Private Corporations and Associations
Agricultural Cooperative Associations
272.285.
Payment of small amounts due deceased member.

If a member of an association dies; and six (6) months or more after his death the association has in its possession moneys not in excess of two hundred dollars ($200) which would have been distributable and payable to such member except for his death; and no administrator or executor has been appointed for his estate or the estate has been closed; then such an association, without making any publication of notice, may disburse such moneys in the following order:

To the surviving spouse of the deceased member; if none, then

To pay any unsatisfied claims for funeral expenses or reimbursement to any person for the payment thereof, then

To any adult person of the class of those nearest of kin to the deceased, for the benefit of all members of such class.

In making such disbursements an association is responsible and liable only for the exercise of good faith and reasonable care and shall have no further responsibility or liability with respect to such moneys or their application or disbursement.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 208, § 18.

272.290.
Existing associations entitled to adopt KRS 272.100 to 272.350.
[Repealed.]

272.291.
Unclaimed dividends, stocks, etc., disposal of.

Any association organized or operated under KRS

272.101

to

272.341

, or any agricultural cooperative association organized under the provisions of KRS Chapter 271B and meeting the requirements of an agricultural cooperative as set forth in Chapter 27, Section 1, 42 U.S. Statutes, p. 388 (Title 7, Sec. 291, U.S.C.A.), or any cooperative association organized under KRS Chapter 279 may recover, after a period of five (5) years, any unclaimed stocks, dividends, patronage refunds, or book equities for which the owner cannot be found and which are the result of distributable savings of the cooperative. The mailing of these stocks, dividends, patronage refunds, or book equities to the last-known address of the individual involved as recorded on the records of the cooperative shall be evidence of a bona fide attempt to deliver the same to the individual. When the notice to the individual of these amounts has been returned by the U.S. mail and the amounts have not been called for, after five (5) years, the amounts involved may be placed in the income of the cooperative for the year in which such determination is made and redistributed to the patrons of that year.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 208, § 30; 1972, ch. 274, § 148.

272.295.
Association not unlawful restraint of trade.

No association, foreign association, or agreements between associations and their members shall be considered a conspiracy, a combination in restraint of trade, an illegal monopoly, an attempt to lessen competition or to fix prices arbitrarily or create a combination or pool in violation of any law of this state.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 208, § 31.

272.300.
Associations are not in restraint of trade.
[Repealed.]

272.301.
Merger of associations.

Two (2) or more associations, either with or without capital stock, may merge into any one of such associations pursuant to a plan of merger as provided in this section.

The board of each association shall, by resolution duly adopted, approve a plan of merger setting forth:

The names of the associations proposing to merge, and the name of the association into which they propose to merge (hereinafter referred to as the surviving association).

The name which the surviving association is to have, which name may be that of any of the associations involved in the merger.

The terms and conditions of the proposed merger.

A statement of any changes in the articles of incorporation of the surviving association to be effected by such merger.

Such other provisions, not inconsistent with law as are deemed necessary or desirable.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 208, § 21.

272.305.
Consolidation of associations.

Two (2) or more associations, either with or without capital stock, may consolidate into a new association pursuant to a plan of consolidation as provided in this section.

The board of each association shall, by resolution duly adopted, approve a plan of consolidation setting forth:

The names of the associations proposing to consolidate, and the name of the new association into which they propose to consolidate (hereinafter referred to as the new association). The name of the new association may be that of any of the associations involved in the consolidation;

The terms and conditions of the proposed consolidation;

With respect to the new association, all of the appropriate statements required to be set forth in articles of incorporation and bylaws of associations organized under KRS

272.101

to

272.341

; and

Such other provisions, not inconsistent with law, as are deemed necessary or desirable.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 208, § 22.

272.310.
Association to reply to inquiries concerning its members and contracts. [Repealed.]

272.311.
Merger or consolidation — Procedures — Articles to be filed and recorded — Contents — Effect.

A plan of merger or consolidation shall be adopted in the following manner:

The board of each merging or consolidating association shall adopt a resolution approving the proposed plan, and directing that it be submitted to a vote at a meeting of the association members, which may be at either an annual or a special meeting. Written or printed notice of the meeting shall be given to each member of the association entitled to vote at such meeting. The notice shall state that the proposed plan of merger or consolidation will be considered and acted upon at the meeting, and a copy or a summary of the plan of merger or plan of consolidation shall be included in or enclosed with such notice. Each notice shall be mailed by first-class mail at such time that not less than ten (10) full days shall elapse between the date of mailing the notice and the date of the meeting, and shall be mailed to each member of the association at his last known address as it appears on the records of the association. The proposed plan shall be adopted by the affirmative vote of not less than two-thirds (2/3) of the votes entitled to be cast by members present in person, or by proxy (if permitted by the bylaws), and voting at such meeting;

By the affirmative vote of not less than two-thirds (2/3) of its members, the board of directors of a parent association may approve on behalf of a wholly-owned subsidiary association a plan of merger or consolidation; and

After the approval by the members, and at any time prior to the filing of articles of merger or articles of consolidation, the merger or consolidation may be abandoned pursuant to provisions set forth in the plan of merger or consolidation.

Upon the approval of the members, articles of merger or articles of consolidation shall be executed, filed and recorded as provided in KRS

271B.11-050

. A copy of the articles of merger or articles of consolidation endorsed by the Secretary of State, with the fact and time of recording in his office, shall be filed with the dean of the College of Agriculture of the University of Kentucky and with the Commissioner, Department of Agriculture.

The articles of merger or the articles of consolidation shall set forth:

The plan of merger or the plan of consolidation; and

A statement setting forth the date of the meeting of the members of each association at which the plan was adopted; that the meeting was duly called and that a quorum was present; and that such plan received an affirmative vote of not less than two-thirds (2/3) of the votes entitled to be cast by members.

The time when the merger or consolidation is effected is determined by the provisions of KRS

271B.11-060

.

When the merger or consolidation has been effected:

The several associations, parties to the plan of merger or plan of consolidation, shall be a single association which, in the case of a merger, shall be the association designated as the surviving association, and, in the case of a consolidation, shall be the new association;

The separate existence of all associations which are parties to the plan of merger or plan of consolidation, except the surviving association or new association, shall cease;

The surviving association or new association shall have all the rights, privileges, franchises, immunities, and powers and shall be subject to all the duties and liabilities of an association organized under KRS

272.101

to

272.341

;

The surviving association or new association shall, to the extent consistent with its articles of incorporation as established or changed by the merger or consolidation, possess all the rights, privileges, immunities, and franchises, of both public and private nature, of each of the merging or consolidating associations; and all property, real, personal and mixed; and all debts due on any account; and all choses in action; and every other interest, of or belonging to or due to each of the associations so merged or consolidated, shall be taken and deemed to be transferred to and vested in such surviving association or new association without further act or deed; and the title to any real estate, wheresoever situated, or any interest therein, shall vest in the surviving association or new association and shall not revert or be in any way impaired by reason of the merger or consolidation;

The surviving association or new association shall be responsible for all the liabilities, contracts or other obligations and penalties of each of the associations so merged or consolidated; and any claim existing or action or proceeding, civil or criminal, pending by or against any of the associations may be prosecuted as if the merger or consolidation had not taken place, or the surviving association or new association may be substituted in its place; and any judgments rendered against any of the merged or consolidated associations may be enforced against the surviving association or new association. Neither the rights of creditors nor any liens upon the property of any merged or consolidated association shall be impaired by the merger or consolidation; and

The articles of incorporation of a surviving association shall be deemed to be amended to the extent, if any, that changes in its articles of incorporation are stated in the plan of merger. The articles of consolidation of a new association shall be deemed to be its articles of incorporation.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 208, §§ 23 to 25; 1968, ch. 148, § 6; 1972, ch. 274, §§ 149, 150; 1988, ch. 23, § 177, effective January 1, 1989.

272.315.
Merger or consolidation with foreign associations, rights of members — Enforcement.

One (1) or more associations organized under KRS

272.101

to

272.341

and one (1) or more foreign associations, or corporations, may be merged or consolidated into an association of this state or an association, or corporation, of another state, the United States, or the District of Columbia, if such merger or consolidation is permitted by the laws under which each such foreign association, or corporation, is organized.

Each domestic association shall comply with KRS

272.101

to

272.341

with respect to the merger or consolidation, as the case may be, of domestic associations, and each foreign association, or corporation, shall comply with the applicable provisions of the laws under which it is organized.

If a surviving association or new association is an association, or corporation, of another state, the United States, or the District of Columbia, it shall comply with the provisions of KRS

272.335

with respect to foreign associations if it is to transact business in this state; and if after the merger or consolidation it transacts no business in this state, the courts of this state have jurisdiction in actions to enforce any obligation of any constituent association of this state and service of process may be made upon the secretary of state for such purpose.

If a surviving association or new association is an association of this state, the effect of the merger or consolidation shall be the same as in KRS

272.311

. If a surviving association or new association is to be an association, or corporation, of another state, the United States, or the District of Columbia, the effect of such merger or consolidation shall be the same as in KRS

272.311

, except insofar as the laws under which it is organized provide otherwise.

If a surviving association or new association is not an association of this state, then:

The rights of any member of any constituent association, that is an association of this state, to receive notice of objectors’ rights, to file his objection, upon such objection to demand and receive payment of the fair market value of his stock or other property rights or interests in the constituent association, or to avail himself of any equitable relief to which he would be entitled if the surviving association or new association were an association of this state, shall not be impaired; and

The courts of this state have jurisdiction in actions to enforce the rights against the surviving association referred to in paragraph (a) of this subsection, or new association regardless of whether or not such association is otherwise subject to the jurisdiction of the courts of this state and in any such action service of process may be made upon the Secretary of State as if the surviving association or new association were transacting business in this state.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 208, § 26.

Opinions of Attorney General.

An agricultural cooperative association is authorized to merge or consolidate with a for-profit corporation organized under the laws of another state.

OAG 72-650

.

A Kentucky agricultural cooperative association may merge with a Kentucky for-profit corporation or with a foreign for-profit corporation (affirming and extending

OAG 72-650

).

OAG 73-539

.

272.320.
Failure to furnish information; presumption. [Repealed.]

272.321.
Member objecting to merger or consolidation to be paid for stock — Value, how fixed — Disposal of shares.

A member of a constituent association to be affected by a merger or consolidation may give to the association prior to or at the meeting of its members to which the proposal of merger or consolidation is submitted to a vote, written notice that he objects to such proposal. Within twenty (20) days after the date on which the vote was taken, such member may, unless he votes in favor of the proposal, make written demand on the association for payment of the fair market value of his stock or other property rights or interest in the association. Such demands shall state the number and class of shares of stock owned by him or the nature and amount of other property rights or interest owned by him in the association. In addition to any other right he may have in law or equity, a member giving such notice shall be entitled, if and when the merger or consolidation is effected, to be paid by the surviving association, or new association, the fair market value of such stock, or other property rights or interests, as of the day prior to the date on which the vote was taken, subject only to the surrender by him of the certificate, or certificates of such stock or other evidence of ownership or other property rights or interests.

If within thirty (30) days after the date upon which the objecting member tendered his written demand for payment of his stock or other property rights or interest, the fair market value of such stock or other property rights or interests is agreed upon between the member and the surviving association, the payment therefor shall be made within sixty (60) days after the date of such agreement, upon surrender of the certificate or other evidence of such property rights or interests, whereupon the member shall cease to have any interest in such stock or other property rights or interest in the association.

If, during the thirty (30) day period mentioned in the preceding subsection, the member and the surviving association or new association do not agree as to the fair market value of such stock or other property rights or interests, the member may, within sixty (60) days thereafter, file a petition in the Circuit Court of the county in which the surviving association or new association has its registered office or principal place of business asking for the appointment of three (3) disinterested appraisers to appraise the fair market value of his stock or other property rights or interests. A summons, together with a copy of the petition, shall be served on the surviving association or new association at least twenty (20) days prior to a hearing on the petition by the court. The award of the appraisers, or a majority of them, if no exceptions be filed thereto within ten (10) days after the award has been filed in court, shall be confirmed by the court, and when confirmed shall be final and conclusive, and the member, upon depositing with the court the proper stock certificates or other evidence of such property rights or interests, shall be entitled to judgment against the association for the appraised value thereof as of the day prior to the date on which the vote was taken. If either party files exceptions to the award of the appraisers within ten (10) days after the award has been filed in court, the case shall be transferred to the civil issue docket of the Circuit Court for trial and shall be there tried in the same manner, as near as may be practicable, as is provided for the trial of cases under the eminent domain law of this state, and with the same right of appeal to the Court of Appeals. The court shall assess the cost of the proceedings as it deems equitable. Upon payment of the judgment, the surviving association or new association is entitled to have the member’s stock certificates or other evidence of such property rights or interests surrendered to it by the clerk of the court. Unless the member files such a petition within the time prescribed, he, his assigns and heirs claiming under him shall have no right to payment hereunder, but in that event nothing herein shall impair his status as a member.

If the notices sent to members in connection with any meeting to vote upon a proposed merger or consolidation make no reference to the provisions of subsection (1) of this section, a member entitled to but through lack of actual knowledge did not avail himself of the provisions of this section, unless he voted for the proposal, is entitled, if he so demands in writing within one (1) year after the date on which the vote was taken on the proposed merger or consolidation, to recover from the surviving association or new association any actual damage which he suffered from failure of the association of which he was a member to make such reference.

The liability to pay for stock or other property rights or interests or to pay damages imposed by subsection (4) of this section on an association extends to the surviving association or new association.

Shares of stock acquired by an association, a surviving association, or a new association pursuant to the payment of an agreed fair market value thereof or to payment of a judgment entered therefor may be held and disposed of by such association as in the case of other treasury shares.

This section does not apply to a merger if on the date of the filing of the articles of merger the surviving association is the owner of all outstanding shares of the other association or associations, domestic or foreign, participating in the merger and if the merger makes no changes in the relative rights of the members of the surviving association.

No member of a constituent association to be affected by a merger or consolidation, who objects thereto and makes written demand for payment of the fair market value of his stock or other property rights or interests in the association, as provided in this section, is entitled to payment at any time prior to the time that he would otherwise be entitled to payment pursuant to valid provisions of such stock, or valid provisions of the articles of incorporation or bylaws of the association, in effect on the date of the vote for such merger or consolidation.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 208, § 28; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 259, effective January 2, 1978; 1984, ch. 111, § 121, effective July 13, 1984.

272.325.
Dissolution of association — Procedure.

An association may discontinue its operations, settle its affairs, and voluntarily dissolve upon the affirmative vote of not less than two-thirds (2/3) of the votes entitled to be cast by its members present in person, or by proxy (if permitted by the bylaws), and voting, or if the association has adopted a delegate plan of voting, upon the affirmative vote of not less than two-thirds (2/3) of the delegates present in person and voting, at any annual or special meeting duly called and convened.

An association so determining to dissolve and wind up, shall designate a committee of three (3) of its members, who shall, on behalf of the association and within the time fixed in their designation, or any extension thereof, liquidate the association’s assets, pay its debts and expenses, including as appropriate entering into agreements with creditors for the satisfaction thereof, and divide its net assets among the members and stockholders pursuant to its articles of incorporation, bylaws, or contracts with members; upon final settlement by such committee, the association shall be dissolved. The committee shall prepare a report of the proceedings had under this section. The report shall be subscribed by the committee members and acknowledged by them before an officer authorized by the law of this state to certify acknowledgments of deeds and conveyances; and shall be filed and recorded in accordance with the statute relating to corporations generally, and when so filed the report, or certified copies thereof, shall be received in all the courts of this state, and other places, as prima facie evidence of the facts contained therein, and of the due dissolution of such association. A copy of the report, indorsed by the Secretary of State with the fact and time of recording in his office, shall be filed with the dean of the College of Agriculture of the University of Kentucky and with the Commissioner, Department of Agriculture.

After the payment of the association’s debts and after provision has been made for the retirement of its capital stock outstanding, if any, at par and accruals thereon, and other fixed obligations, if any, held by members, the net assets remaining if no provision is made in the association’s articles of incorporation, bylaws, or contracts with members may be distributed to members and other patrons by distribution based on dollar volume of purchases by such members and patrons or other unit of measure or on products marketed as shown by the association books over the preceding five (5) fiscal years or if the estimated cost of making such distribution, in the opinion of the committee approximate more than fifty percent (50%) of the amount available for distribution, the association may dispose of its net assets by converting them to cash and paying the money over to the College of Agriculture of the University of Kentucky, or to any nonprofit farm organization operating within the areas served by the cooperative.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 208, § 29; 1974, ch. 159, § 1; 2012, ch. 81, § 99, effective July 12, 2012.

272.330.
Failure to request information; presumption. [Repealed.]

272.331.
Association formed under prior law subject to this law — Rights.

An association, or corporation, heretofore formed under or subject to statutes repealed by the 1966 Act [272.010(2);

272.060

;

272.100

to

272.350

], shall continue under and be subject to the provisions of this chapter as if incorporated hereunder; but all rights of property and contract which accrued before June 16, 1966 shall continue to be governed by the law under which such rights accrued. An association, also may continue to use its existing name, type of operations, bylaws, forms of marketing contracts, methods of financing and requirements as to reserves insofar as valid under prior laws unless expressly contrary to the provisions of KRS

272.101

to

272.341

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 208, § 33.

272.333.
KRS 136.060 not applicable to membership certificates, stock, or other evidence of member, shareholder or patron interest.

The provisions of KRS

136.060

shall not apply to the issuance of membership certificates, shares of stock or any other evidence of member, shareholder, or patron interest by any such agricultural cooperative association.

History.

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 148, § 7; 1976, ch. 12, § 1, effective March 1, 1976; 2019 ch. 151, § 78, effective June 27, 2019.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(4/27/2018).
KRS

136.070

was repealed in
2018 Ky. Acts chs. 171 and
207, but a conforming amendment was not made to this statute to address the reference it contains to
KRS

136.070

. The Reviser of Statutes has determined that making such a conforming change during the 2018 codification exceeds the permissible correction of manifest clerical or typographical errors under
KRS 7.136(1)(h). Therefore, the reference to
KRS 136.070 remains unchanged and would have to be changed pursuant to future legislative action.

272.335.
Foreign association doing business.

A foreign association may be authorized to transact business in this Commonwealth upon compliance with the provisions of KRS

14A.9-010

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 208, § 34; 1972, ch. 112, § 8; 1972, ch. 274, § 151; 1988, ch. 23, § 178, effective January 1, 1989; 2010, ch. 151, § 58, effective January 1, 2011; 2011, ch. 29, § 11, effective June 8, 2011.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(6/8/2011). 2011 Ky. Acts ch. 29, sec. 24, provides that the amendments to this section in 2011 Ky. Acts ch. 29, sec. 11, are retroactive to January 1, 2011.

272.340.
Mortgage on crops under marketing contract; disposition of proceeds upon foreclosure. [Repealed.]

272.341.
Association without capital stock subject to Chapter 271B.

The provisions of KRS Chapter 271B shall apply, so far as appropriate, to every association with or without capital stock heretofore or hereafter organized or domesticated under this chapter, except where the provisions of such laws are in conflict with or inconsistent with this chapter.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 208, § 35; 1972, ch. 274, § 152.

272.345.
Association personnel indemnified against personal liability — Compromise settlements — Prior approval — Payment of expenses and costs — Purchase of insurance.

Each director, officer, employee or agent of an association organized or operating under KRS

272.121

to

272.341

, or his personal representative, or any person who is or was serving at the request of an association as a director, officer, employee or agent of another association, corporation, partnership, joint venture, trust or other enterprise or entity, or such person’s personal representative, shall be indemnified by the association against claims, liabilities, expenses, and costs actually and necessarily incurred by him or his estate in connection with, or arising out of, any action in which he is made a party by reason of his being, or having been, an officer, director, employee, or agent, if he acted in good faith and in a manner he reasonably believed to be in or not opposed to the best interests of the association, and with respect to any criminal action or proceeding, had no reasonable cause to believe his conduct was unlawful.

The right of indemnification herein provided for shall also apply with respect to any amount paid in compromise of any such claim asserted against such director, officer, employee or agent (including expenses and costs actually and necessarily incurred in connection therewith); provided the board of directors of the association shall have first approved such proposed compromise settlement and determined that the director, officer, employee or agent involved was acting in good faith and in a manner he reasonably believed to be in or not opposed to the best interests of the association; but in taking such action any director involved shall not be qualified to vote thereon, and if for this reason a quorum of the board cannot be obtained to vote on such matter it shall be determined by a committee of three (3) disinterested shareholders appointed by the shareholders at a duly called special meeting, or at a regular meeting.

Expenses and costs (including attorney’s fees) incurred by a director, officer, employee or agent in defending an action as aforesaid may be paid by the association in advance of the final disposition of such action upon receipt of an undertaking by or on behalf of such director, officer, employee or agent to repay such amount unless it shall ultimately be determined that he is entitled to be indemnified by the association.

The right of indemnification herein provided for shall not be exclusive of any other rights to which an officer, director, employee or agent may be entitled under any bylaw, agreement, vote of shareholders, vote of disinterested directors or otherwise, both as to action in an official capacity and as to action in another capacity (including, without limitation, serving at the request of the association as a director, officer, employee or agent of another association, corporation, partnership, joint venture, trust or other enterprise or entity), and shall continue as to any person who has ceased to be a director, officer, employee or agent and shall inure to the benefit of any heirs, executors and administrators of any such person.

An association shall have the power to purchase and maintain insurance on behalf of any person who is or was an officer, director, employee or agent of the association, or is or was serving at the request of the association as a director, officer, employee or agent of another association, corporation, partnership, joint venture, trust or other enterprise or entity, against any liability asserted against him or incurred by him in any such capacity or arising out of his status as such, whether or not such association would have the power to indemnify him against such liability under the provisions of this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 112, § 9; 1984, ch. 111, § 122, effective July 13, 1984.

272.350.
Limitation of the use of term “cooperative.” [Repealed.]